Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 18 Child Maltreatment Act
12-18-805. Video teleconferencing and teleconferencing options.

An administrative law judge may conduct an administrative hearing under this chapter by video teleconference in lieu of an in-person hearing.

If neither party requests that the administrative hearing be conducted in person, the administrative hearing shall be conducted telephonically.

If any party requests an in-person administrative hearing within thirty (30) days from the date that the party receives notification of the investigative determination, the in-person administrative hearing shall be conducted in an office of the Department of Human Services nearest to the petitioner's residence unless the administrative law judge notifies the parties that the administrative hearing will be conducted via video teleconference.

The Office of Appeals and Hearings of the Department of Human Services shall designate the sites to be used for video teleconference administrative hearings.

The office shall designate sites within ten (10) miles of the following cities:

Arkadelphia;

Booneville;

Conway;

Fayetteville;

Jonesboro;

Little Rock; and

Warren.

The office may designate additional sites for video teleconference administrative hearings.

A site for a video teleconference administrative hearing shall include the location designated by the office that is nearest to the petitioner's residence.

The administrative law judge and other parties may agree to appear at the location designated by the office or at any other designated administrative hearing locations that are convenient to them.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “of the investigative determination” in (b).

The department receives further information;

The alleged offender gives notice of the existence of further information; or

The department examines the record and determines that additional information exists.

If additional information is found to exist, the record shall be supplemented and the department shall provide a copy of the supplemented record to the alleged offender.

At least ten (10) days prior to the administrative hearing, the alleged offender and the department shall share any information with the other party that the party intends to introduce into evidence at the administrative hearing that is not contained in the record.

If a party fails to timely share information, the administrative law judge shall:

Any time accrued during the continuance or allowing the record to remain open shall not be counted in the one-hundred-eighty-day time period to complete the administrative hearing.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

Administrative law judge did not err in finding that a mother was precluded from relitigating maltreatment issues since they had been previously adjudicated in a dependency-neglect action; the “actually litigated” element of collateral estoppel was satisfied. The dependency-neglect adjudication was issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, and the adjudication involved a question to be determined by the Office of Appeals and Hearings of the Department of Human Services.Ogborn v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2017 Ark. App. 600, 532 S.W.3d 621 (2017).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “and the hearing record, including all exhibits” in (a), (b), and (c); and deleted “and all exhibits submitted at the hearing” following “under this chapter” in (a).

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1).

Children;

The elderly; or

Persons with disabilities or mental illnesses.

A reasonable fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) for researching, copying, or mailing records from a child maltreatment investigative file; and

A reasonable fee for reproducing copies of electronic media, such as audio tapes, video tapes, compact discs, DVDs, and photographs.

A fee shall not be charged to a person who is indigent.

Unless waived by the alleged offender, the expedited administrative hearing process shall not be held until at least thirty (30) days have elapsed after the investigative file is made available to the alleged offender.

As used in this section, “made available” means notification to the offender or his or her attorney that a copy of the investigative record is available for pickup at the Department of Human Services office in the county in which the alleged offender resides or in the Department of Human Services office in the county designated by the alleged offender or his or her attorney.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “or mailing records from a child maltreatment investigative file” for “and mailing records of an investigative file” in (d)(1)(A); and substituted “electronic media, such as audio tapes, video recordings, compact discs, or DVDs and photographs” for “tapes and photographs” in (d)(1)(B).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1).

There is an ongoing criminal or delinquency investigation regarding the occurrence that is the subject of the child maltreatment investigation; or

Criminal or delinquency charges are filed or will be filed regarding the occurrence that is the subject of the child maltreatment investigation.

At the preliminary administrative hearing, the administrative law judge shall determine whether a prima facie case exists that:

If the administrative law judge determines there is not a prima facie case, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall not at that time place the alleged offender's name in the registry but may continue to provide notice to the alleged offender for a regular administrative hearing.

If the administrative law judge determines there is a prima facie case, the administrative law judge shall direct that the offender's name shall be provisionally placed in the registry.

If an offender's name is provisionally placed in the registry the alleged offender may request a regular administrative hearing within thirty (30) days of receipt of the notice of the investigative determination.

Failure to timely request a regular administrative hearing shall result in a finding by the administrative law judge that the provisional designation shall be removed and the offender's name shall be officially placed in the registry.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 802, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)All members of society desire the safety of all children;

“(2)A child raised under constant adult supervision may miss opportunities for growth that will negatively impact his or her mental and physical development;

“(3)The alarming rise of childhood obesity and diabetes is almost certainly linked to an increase in the sedentary lifestyle and lack of physical activity for children today, which is often encouraged by parents and guardians, including without limitation by insisting on driving their children to school;

“(4)As measured by incidences of mental health difficulties, the over-supervised youth of today experience more difficulties when they reach adulthood than earlier generations;

“(5)Earlier generations learned resilience by walking, bicycling, playing, helping, and solving problems without constant adult intervention;

“(6)Parents and guardians are often in the best position to weigh the risk and make decisions concerning the safety of children under their care, including without limitation where their child may go, with whom, and when; and

“(7)Parents and guardians who have done nothing more than briefly and safely permitted their children to remain unsupervised should not be subject to investigation and possible prosecution as it causes unnecessary governmental intrusion and diversion of valuable public resources.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act:

“(1)Protect and promote the inherent right of a parent or guardian to raise his or her children;

“(2)Protect the decision of a parent or a guardian to grant his or her children unsupervised time to engage in activities that include without limitation playing outside, walking to school, bicycling, remaining briefly in a vehicle, and remaining at home; and

“(3)Ensure that valuable public resources are used most effectively to protect children by providing a secondary review to ensure that:

“(A)Calls to the Child Abuse Hotline are properly accepted;

“(B)Child maltreatment investigations are closed when the results of the investigation indicate that the allegations lack merit; and

“(C)Only the names of offenders who pose a risk to a vulnerable population are placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.”

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (c).

The 2015 amendment inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a).

The 2019 amendment, in (d)(2), inserted the second occurrence of “a” and substituted “maltreatment” for “harm”.

The alleged offender eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time the act or omission occurred was provided written notice of the true investigative determination as required by this chapter but failed to timely request an administrative hearing;

The alleged offender eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time the act or omission occurred timely requested an administrative hearing and a decision has been issued by the administrative law judge; or

The alleged offender was a child at the time the act or omission occurred and the child or his or her legal parent or legal guardian waived the administrative hearing or the administrative law judge issued a decision.

Upon satisfaction of due process, if the investigative determination is true, the alleged offender's name shall be placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

(1)Upon satisfaction of due process and if the investigative determination is true, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall provide the local educational agency, specifically the school counselor at the school the maltreated child attends, a report including the name and relationship of the offender to the maltreated child and the services offered or provided by the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police to the child.

Any local educational agency receiving information under this section from the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall make this information, if it is a true report, confidential and a part of the child's permanent educational record and shall treat information under this section as educational records are treated under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.

The offender's employer;

A school superintendent, principal, or a person in an equivalent position where the offender is employed;

A person in charge of a paid or volunteer activity;

Any licensing or registering authority to the extent necessary to carry out its official responsibilities; and

The custodial parent, custodian, or guardian of a child who is or may be currently cared for or supervised by the offender.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate rules that shall ensure that notification required under this subsection is specifically approved by a responsible manager in the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police before the notification is made.

If the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police later determine that there is not a preponderance of the evidence indicating that children under the care of the alleged offender appear to be at risk, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the previously notified person or entity of that information.

Upon satisfaction of due process, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police may notify the entity or person in charge of the investigative determination if:

The investigative determination is true; and

The alleged offender is a juvenile who is in a setting or circumstance where other children appear to be at risk.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall promulgate rules to ensure that notification required under this section is specifically approved by a responsible manager in the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police before notification is made.

If the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police later determine that there is no preponderance of the evidence indicating that children appear to be at risk, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall immediately notify the previously notified entity or person of that information.

Upon satisfaction of due process, if the victim or offender is in foster care, notification of the investigative determination shall be provided to:

Upon satisfaction of due process, notification of the investigative determination shall be provided to the following:

Upon satisfaction of due process, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall confirm the investigative determination to the following, upon request:

Any licensing or registering authority if it is necessary to carry out its official responsibilities;

Any Department of Human Services division director or facility director receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under this subchapter;

The attorney ad litem and Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for all other children in the same foster home if the child maltreatment occurred in a foster home;

The attorney ad litem and Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for any child in foster care when the alleged offender or underaged juvenile offender is placed in the same placement as the attorney ad litem or Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer's client;

A child safety center if involved in the investigation;

Law enforcement;

The prosecuting attorney in cases of severe maltreatment;

Any family advocacy program or other person designated by the military authority for the military installation receiving notice of a Child Abuse Hotline report under § 12-18-508; and

The attorney ad litem and court-appointed special advocate of a juvenile who has an open dependency-neglect case, if the alleged offender or the minor victim resides in the home or in the proposed placement location for the juvenile that is not a licensed foster home, adoptive home, shelter, or facility.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment deleted former (b) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; substituted “Department of Human Services” for “department” in (c)(1); substituted “for the victim or offender” for “any other children in the same foster home if the maltreatment occurred in the foster home” in (d)(2); deleted (e)(2) through (e)(11) and redesignated the remaining subdivision as (e)(2); and added (f) and (g).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (c)(1) and added (c)(4).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1004 inserted “and the Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(1).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1026 substituted “Department of Human Services or the Department of Arkansas State Police” for “department” twice in (c)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 528 added (f)(12).

The 2017 amendment by No. 803 added (f)(13).

The 2019 amendment added (c)(1)(E).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 802, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)All members of society desire the safety of all children;

“(2)A child raised under constant adult supervision may miss opportunities for growth that will negatively impact his or her mental and physical development;

“(3)The alarming rise of childhood obesity and diabetes is almost certainly linked to an increase in the sedentary lifestyle and lack of physical activity for children today, which is often encouraged by parents and guardians, including without limitation by insisting on driving their children to school;

“(4)As measured by incidences of mental health difficulties, the over-supervised youth of today experience more difficulties when they reach adulthood than earlier generations;

“(5)Earlier generations learned resilience by walking, bicycling, playing, helping, and solving problems without constant adult intervention;

“(6)Parents and guardians are often in the best position to weigh the risk and make decisions concerning the safety of children under their care, including without limitation where their child may go, with whom, and when; and

“(7)Parents and guardians who have done nothing more than briefly and safely permitted their children to remain unsupervised should not be subject to investigation and possible prosecution as it causes unnecessary governmental intrusion and diversion of valuable public resources.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act:

“(1)Protect and promote the inherent right of a parent or guardian to raise his or her children;

“(2)Protect the decision of a parent or a guardian to grant his or her children unsupervised time to engage in activities that include without limitation playing outside, walking to school, bicycling, remaining briefly in a vehicle, and remaining at home; and

“(3)Ensure that valuable public resources are used most effectively to protect children by providing a secondary review to ensure that:

“(A)Calls to the Child Abuse Hotline are properly accepted;

“(B)Child maltreatment investigations are closed when the results of the investigation indicate that the allegations lack merit; and

“(C)Only the names of offenders who pose a risk to a vulnerable population are placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, No. 575, § 3: Apr. 2, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas public school students and their parents or guardians should be confident that any person who is allowed to volunteer at a school district or an education service cooperative does not have a criminal record and is not a potential threat to the safety of children; and that this act is immediately necessary to afford additional protection to school children from all persons in school districts or education service cooperatives who might sexually, physically, or emotionally abuse students entrusted into their care. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 945, § 11: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some juveniles in Arkansas may be unaware of their rights under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., and other applicable law; that some individuals and entities that are responsible for the welfare of a juvenile may be unaware of the rights of the juvenile under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §9-27-301 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq., and other applicable law; that the creation of the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division within the Arkansas Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Commission will help increase awareness of a juvenile's legal rights; that independent oversight of the child welfare system in Arkansas is more than likely to result in recommendations that will further improve the procedures and operations of the child welfare system; and that this act is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

ALR.

Challenges to Placement on State Child Abuse Registries on Other Than Constitutional Bases, 25 A.L.R.7th Art. 1 (2018).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 23.

12-18-806. Continuances.

(1)An administrative law judge shall grant a continuance if the record under this chapter tendered by the Department of Human Services to the alleged offender is determined by the administrative law judge to be incomplete.

The administrative law judge shall direct the department to make diligent inquiry and obtain the missing information to supplement the record if:

Grant a continuance;

Allow the record to remain open for submission of rebuttal evidence; or

Reject the information as not relevant to the incident of child maltreatment.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-807. Administrative judgments and adjudications.

If a court of competent jurisdiction adjudicates a question that is an issue to be determined by the Office of Appeals and Hearings of the Department of Human Services, the prevailing party to the judicial adjudication who is also a party to the administrative adjudication shall file a certified copy of the judicial adjudication with the office.

(1)The office shall determine whether and to what extent the judicial adjudication has preclusive effect on the administrative adjudication by applying the principles of claim preclusion and issue preclusion.

The office shall not readjudicate any precluded issues.

If the judicial adjudication is modified or reversed, the office shall determine whether and to what extent any issue in the administrative adjudication remains precluded and shall schedule a hearing with respect to any matter that is no longer precluded.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 24.

12-18-808. Notice of juvenile division circuit court proceedings.

The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall notify the administrative law judge and the petitioner of the status of any juvenile division of circuit court proceeding involving the victim if child maltreatment at issue in the administrative hearing proceeding is also an issue in the juvenile division of circuit court proceeding.

Notice from the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police under this section shall also include whether the Department of Human Services exercised a seventy-two-hour hold on the victim and released the child or if the Department of Human Services or division of circuit court dismissed a petition for emergency custody or dependency-neglect.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 26.

12-18-809. Confidentiality.

An administrative hearing decision and the hearing record, including all exhibits, under this chapter are confidential and shall remain confidential upon the filing of an appeal with a circuit court or an appellate court.

An administrative hearing decision and the hearing record, including all exhibits, under this chapter that uphold the agency investigative determination of true may be used or disclosed only as provided in this chapter.

An administrative hearing decision and the hearing record, including all exhibits, under this chapter that overturn the agency investigative determination of true may be used or disclosed only as provided in this chapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 21.

12-18-810. Authority to amend investigative determinations based on evidence.

An administrative law judge may amend an investigative determination to conform with the evidence presented.

(1)If the alleged offender could not reasonably infer the amended investigative determination from the investigative record and information submitted by the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police, the administrative law judge shall, upon request, grant a continuance to the alleged offender.

However, an amendment of the investigative determination shall not be done after the conclusion of the hearing.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2015, No. 1004, § 27.

12-18-811. Expedited administrative hearings — Definition.

(1)If an alleged offender timely requests an administrative hearing, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may request that the administrative hearing be expedited if the alleged offender is engaged in child-related activities or employment or the alleged offender is employed or a volunteer with persons with disabilities, persons with mental illnesses, or elderly persons.

The alleged offender shall have five (5) days from date of receipt of the request for an expedited administrative hearing to object to any request to expedite the administrative hearing.

The expedited administrative hearing shall be granted if any of the following are at risk because of the alleged offender's employment or volunteer activities:

If the administrative hearing is expedited, the Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police shall immediately make the investigative file available to the alleged offender.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Department of Arkansas State Police may charge:

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 25; 2015, No. 1004, § 28.

12-18-812. Preliminary administrative hearing.

If the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police are unable to notify an offender of an investigative determination under this chapter, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police may request a preliminary administrative hearing to allow provisional placement of the offender's name in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police must prove that the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police diligently attempted to notify the alleged offender of the investigative determination, specifically, that the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police used a reasonable degree of care to ascertain the offender's whereabouts and notify the offender.

(1)The Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall notify the administrative law judge of any known criminal action related to the investigation.

A preliminary administrative hearing shall proceed even if:

The offender committed child maltreatment, that is, whether a preponderance of the evidence supports a finding that the allegations are true; and

A child, elderly person, person with a disability, or person with a mental illness may be at risk of maltreatment.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2013, No. 1006, § 26; 2015, No. 1004, § 29; 2019, No. 802, § 6.

12-18-813. Notice of investigative determination upon satisfaction of due process.

(1)Due process has been satisfied when:

Upon completion of due process, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police shall provide the local educational agency, specifically the school counselor at the school the maltreated child attends, a report indicating the Department of Human Services’ and the Division of Arkansas State Police's true investigative determination on any child ten (10) years of age or older who is named as the offender in a true report and the services offered or provided by the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police to the juvenile offender.

(1)Upon satisfaction of due process and if the investigative determination is true, if the offender is engaged in child-related activities or employment, works with the elderly, an individual with a disability, or an individual with a mental illness, or is a juvenile and the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police has determined that children, the elderly, or individuals with a disability or mental illness under the care of the offender appear to be at risk of maltreatment by the offender, the Department of Human Services or the Division of Arkansas State Police may notify the following of the investigative determination:

The legal parents, legal guardians, and current foster parents of the victim; and

The attorney ad litem and court-appointed special advocate volunteer for the victim or offender.

All subjects of the report; and

As required by §21-15-110, the employer of any offender if the offender is in a designated position with a state agency.

The responsible multidisciplinary team;

The juvenile division of circuit court, if the victim or offender has an open dependency-neglect or family in need of services case;

The attorney ad litem for a child who is named as the victim or offender;

The Court Appointed Special Advocates volunteer for a child named as the alleged victim or offender;

Upon satisfaction of due process, the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police may notify the persons or entities listed in subsection (f) of this section of the investigative determination if the Department of Human Services and the Division of Arkansas State Police determine that the notification is necessary to accomplish the purposes of §12-18-102.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2011, No. 1143, § 22; 2013, No. 1006, § 27; 2015, No. 1004, § 30; 2015, No. 1026, §
14; 2017, No. 528, § 5; 2017, No. 803, § 4; 2019, No. 531, § 4.

12-18-814. Automatic hearings for juveniles.

The Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Human Services shall provide written referrals to the Office of Appeals and Hearings of the Department of Human Services identifying each juvenile who is:

The subject of a true child maltreatment finding; and

Subject to placement on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

The office shall schedule an administrative hearing for each juvenile identified under subsection (a) of this section.

An administrative hearing scheduled under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the administrative hearing provisions of this subchapter except that the office shall not dismiss the case and place the petitioner's name on the registry based solely on the petitioner's failure to provide a file-marked copy of the final disposition of the criminal or delinquency proceeding within thirty (30) days of the entry of the final disposition.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1006, § 28.

12-18-815. Adjudication of allegations and risk.

In an administrative hearing held under this chapter, an administrative law judge shall determine whether:

A preponderance of the evidence supports a finding that an allegation of child maltreatment is true; and

The Department of Human Services abused its discretion in determining that an offender may pose a risk of maltreatment to a vulnerable population that includes without limitation, children, the elderly, persons with a disability, and persons with a mental health illness.

An administrative law judge shall direct the name of an offender to be placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry if a preponderance of the evidence supports a finding that:

An allegation of child maltreatment is true; and

The department did not abuse its discretion in determining that the offender may pose a risk of maltreatment to a vulnerable population.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 802, § 7.

Subchapter 9

— Child Maltreatment Central Registry

12-18-901. Creation.

There is established within the Department of Human Services a statewide Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-902. Contents.

The Child Maltreatment Central Registry shall contain records of cases on all true investigative determinations of child maltreatment.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-903. Placement in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

An offender's name shall be placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry if:

After notice, the offender eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time the act or omission occurred does not timely request an administrative hearing;

The alleged offender was a child at the time of the act or omission and the child or his or her legal parent or legal guardian waived the administrative hearing;

The administrative law judge upheld the investigative determination of true pursuant to a preliminary administrative hearing; or

Upon completion of the administrative hearing process, the Department of Human Services' or Division of Arkansas State Police's investigative determination of true is upheld.

In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, the name of an offender shall be placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry only if the Department of Human Services determines under § 12-18-702 that the offender may pose a risk of maltreatment to a vulnerable population that includes without limitation children, the elderly, persons with a disability, and persons with a mental health illness.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 802, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)All members of society desire the safety of all children;

“(2)A child raised under constant adult supervision may miss opportunities for growth that will negatively impact his or her mental and physical development;

“(3)The alarming rise of childhood obesity and diabetes is almost certainly linked to an increase in the sedentary lifestyle and lack of physical activity for children today, which is often encouraged by parents and guardians, including without limitation by insisting on driving their children to school;

“(4)As measured by incidences of mental health difficulties, the over-supervised youth of today experience more difficulties when they reach adulthood than earlier generations;

“(5)Earlier generations learned resilience by walking, bicycling, playing, helping, and solving problems without constant adult intervention;

“(6)Parents and guardians are often in the best position to weigh the risk and make decisions concerning the safety of children under their care, including without limitation where their child may go, with whom, and when; and

“(7)Parents and guardians who have done nothing more than briefly and safely permitted their children to remain unsupervised should not be subject to investigation and possible prosecution as it causes unnecessary governmental intrusion and diversion of valuable public resources.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly that this act:

“(1)Protect and promote the inherent right of a parent or guardian to raise his or her children;

“(2)Protect the decision of a parent or a guardian to grant his or her children unsupervised time to engage in activities that include without limitation playing outside, walking to school, bicycling, remaining briefly in a vehicle, and remaining at home; and

“(3)Ensure that valuable public resources are used most effectively to protect children by providing a secondary review to ensure that:

“(A)Calls to the Child Abuse Hotline are properly accepted;

“(B)Child maltreatment investigations are closed when the results of the investigation indicate that the allegations lack merit; and

“(C)Only the names of offenders who pose a risk to a vulnerable population are placed on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (b) and designated the former section as (a).

Substantial evidence supported the decision of the Department of Human Services that a teacher had committed sexual abuse of a minor student and ordering that the teacher's name be placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, even though the criminal charges had been dropped; the ALJ had clearly considered the teacher's defenses and rejected them, the appellate court does not act as a super factfinder, and the teacher could not complain that he was denied an opportunity to cross-examine the student when he failed to subpoena her.J.C. v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2019 Ark. App. 131, 572 S.W.3d 878 (2019).

It was error to reverse the decision of the Department of Human Services to place a father's name on the Child Maltreatment Central Registry because substantial evidence supported the decision, as the father drove while impaired by alcohol at twice the legal limit with his then six-year-old son in the car, which constituted inadequate supervision (neglect) and a threat of harm (abuse) under §12-18-103. The statutes do not require that actual injury occur for findings of abuse or neglect.Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Newcity, 2020 Ark. App. 32, 594 S.W.3d 112 (2020).

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1; 2019, No. 802, § 8.

12-18-904. Child Maltreatment Central Registry generally.

An offender's name shall remain in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry unless:

The name is removed pursuant to this chapter or another statute;

The name is removed under a rule;

The name was provisionally placed in the registry and the alleged offender subsequently prevails at an administrative hearing; or

The offender prevails upon appeal.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-905. Provisional placement in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

If an alleged offender's name is provisionally placed in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, any disclosure by the registry shall include the notation that the name has only been provisionally placed in the registry.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-906. Allegations determined to be unsubstantiated not to be included.

Records of all cases in which allegations are determined to be unsubstantiated shall not be included in the Child Maltreatment Central Registry.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.

12-18-907. Rules.

The Department of Human Services may adopt rules as may be necessary to encourage cooperation with other states in exchanging true reports and to effect a national registration system.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 749, §
1.